data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX s   ir      írem-nas       truir
SFX s   ir      írem-no        truir
SFX s   ir      írem-nos       truir
SFX s   ir      írem-se        truir
SFX s   ir      írem-te        truir
SFX s   ir      írem-vos       truir
SFX s   0       -la-emos       truir
SFX s   0       -las-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-emos     truir
SFX s   0       -lo-emos       truir
SFX s   0       -los-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -nos-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -te-emos       truir
SFX s   0       -vos-emos      truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-ia        truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-ia       truir
SFX s   0       -me-ia         truir
SFX s   0       -nos-ia        truir
SFX s   0       -se-ia         truir
SFX s   0       -te-ia         truir
SFX s   0       -vos-ia        truir
SFX s   0       -lhe-iam       truir
SFX s   0       -lhes-iam      truir
SFX s   0       -me-iam        truir
SFX s   0       -nos-iam       truir
SFX s   0       -se-iam        truir
SFX s   0       -te-iam        truir
SFX s   0       -vos-iam       truir
SFX s   0       íamo-nos       truir
SFX s   0       íamos-vos       truir
SFX s   0       íamos-lhe      truir
SFX s   0       íamos-lhes     truir
SFX s   0       íamos-te       truir
SFX s   0       mo-nos         truir
SFX s   0       mos-vos         truir
SFX s   0       mos-lhe        truir
SFX s   0       mos-lhes       truir
SFX s   0       mos-te         truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-a         truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-as        truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-me        truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-nos       truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-o         truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-os        truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-se        truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-te        truir
SFX s   ir      ísse-vos       truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-lhe      truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-lhes     truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-me       truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-na       truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-nas      truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-no       truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-nos      truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-te       truir
SFX s   ir      íssem-vos      truir
SFX s   ir      íste-a         truir
SFX s   ir      íste-as        truir
SFX s   ir      íste-lhe       truir
SFX s   ir      íste-lhes      truir
SFX s   ir      íste-me        truir
SFX s   ir      íste-nos       truir
SFX s   ir      íste-o         truir
SFX s   ir      íste-os        truir
SFX s   ir      íste-se        truir
SFX s   ir      íste-te        truir
SFX s   ir      íste-vos       truir
SFX s   r       u-a            truir
SFX s   r       u-as           truir
SFX s   r       u-lhe          truir
SFX s   r       u-lhes         truir
SFX s   r       u-me           truir
SFX s   r       u-nos          truir
SFX s   r       u-o            truir
SFX s   r       u-os           truir
SFX s   r       u-se           truir
SFX s   r       u-te           truir
SFX s   r       u-vos          truir
SFX s   ir      o-a            truir
SFX s   ir      o-as           truir
SFX s   ir      o-lhe          truir
SFX s   ir      o-lhes         truir
SFX s   ir      o-me           truir
SFX s   ir      o-nos          truir
SFX s   ir      o-o            truir
SFX s   ir      o-os           truir
SFX s   ir      o-se           truir
SFX s   ir      o-te           truir
SFX s   ir      o-vos          truir
SFX s   uir     ói-a           truir
SFX s   uir     ói-as          truir
SFX s   uir     ói-lhe         truir
SFX s   uir     ói-lhes        truir
SFX s   uir     ói-me          truir
SFX s   uir     ói-nos         truir
SFX s   uir     ói-o           truir
SFX s   uir     ói-os          truir
SFX s   uir     ói-se          truir
SFX s   uir     ói-te          truir
SFX s   uir     ói-vos         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-lhe        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-lhes       truir
SFX s   uir     oem-me         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-na         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-nas        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-no         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-nos        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-te         truir
SFX s   uir     oem-vos        truir
SFX s   uir     oem-se         truir
SFX s   ir      e-a            ergir
SFX s   ir      e-as           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-lhe          ergir
SFX s   ir      e-lhes         ergir
SFX s   ir      e-me           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-nos          ergir
SFX s   ir      e-o            ergir
SFX s   ir      e-os           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-se           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-te           ergir
SFX s   ir      e-vos          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-lhe         ergir
SFX s   ir      em-lhes        ergir
SFX s   ir      em-me          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-na          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-nas         ergir
SFX s   ir      em-no          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-nos         ergir
SFX s   ir      em-se          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-te          ergir
SFX s   ir      em-vos         ergir
SFX s   r       -a             ergir
SFX s   r       -as            ergir
SFX s   r       -lhe           ergir
SFX s   r       -lhes          ergir
SFX s   r       -me            ergir
SFX s   r       -nos           ergir
SFX s   r       -o             ergir
SFX s   r       -os            ergir
SFX s   r       -se            ergir
SFX s   r       -te            ergir
SFX s   r       -vos           ergir
SFX s   r       a-a            ergir
SFX s   r       a-as           ergir
SFX s   r       a-lhe          ergir
SFX s   r       a-lhes         ergir
SFX s   r       a-me           ergir
SFX s   r       a-nos          ergir
SFX s   r       a-o            ergir
SFX s   r       a-os           ergir
SFX s   r       a-se           ergir
SFX s   r       a-te           ergir
SFX s   r       a-vos          ergir
SFX s   r       am-lhe         ergir
SFX s   r       am-lhes        ergir
SFX s   r       am-me          ergir
SFX s   r       am-na          ergir
SFX s   r       am-nas         ergir
SFX s   r       am-no          ergir
SFX s   r       am-nos         ergir
SFX s   r       am-se          ergir
SFX s   r       am-te          ergir
SFX s   r       am-vos         ergir
SFX s   ir      íamo-nos       ergir
SFX s   ir      íamos-vos       ergir
SFX s   ir      íamos-lhe      ergir
SFX s   ir      íamos-lhes     ergir
SFX s   ir      íamos-te       ergir
SFX s   r       do-a           ergir
SFX s   r       do-as          ergir
SFX s   r       do-lhe         ergir
SFX s   r       do-lhes        ergir
SFX s   r       do-me          ergir
SFX s   r       do-nos         ergir
SFX s   r       do-o           ergir
SFX s   r       do-os          ergir
SFX s   r       do-se          ergir
SFX s   r       do-te          ergir
SFX s   r       do-vos         ergir
SFX s   r       mo-nos         ergir
SFX s   r       mos-vos         ergir
SFX s   r       mos-lhe        ergir
SFX s   r       mos-lhes       ergir
SFX s   r       mos-te         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-a          ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-as         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-lhe        ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-lhes       ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-me         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-nos        ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-o          ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-os         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-se         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-te         ergir
SFX s   r       ndo-vos        ergir
SFX s   0       a-a            ergir
SFX s   0       a-as           ergir
SFX s   0       a-lhe          ergir
SFX s   0       a-lhes         ergir
SFX s   0       a-me           ergir
SFX s   0       a-nos          ergir
SFX s   0       a-o            ergir
SFX s   0       a-os           ergir
SFX s   0       a-se           ergir
SFX s   0       a-te           ergir
SFX s   0       a-vos          ergir
SFX s   0       -la-á          ergir
SFX s   0       -las-á         ergir
SFX s   0       -lhe-á         ergir
SFX s   0       -lhes-á        ergir
SFX s   0       -lo-á          ergir
SFX s   0       -los-á         ergir
SFX s   0       -me-á          ergir
